Wisconsin, session 2025, SB242.
do enact as follows:SB242,13Section 1. 106.015 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB242,2,24106.015 (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), the department may not prescribe, 5enforce, or authorize, whether through the promulgation of a rule, the issuance of a 6general or special order, the approval of an apprenticeship program or apprentice 7contract, or otherwise, a ratio of apprentices to journeyworkers for apprenticeship 1programs or apprentice contracts that requires more than one journeyworker for 2each apprentice 2 apprentices.SB242,23Section 2. Initial applicability.SB242,2,74(1) This act first applies to an apprenticeship contract governed by a collective 5bargaining agreement that contains provisions that are inconsistent with this act 6on the day that the agreement expires or is extended, modified or renewed, 7whichever occurs first.SB242,2,88